chv.twol
Alphabet

А Ӑ Б В Г Д Е Ӗ Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Ҫ Т У Ӳ Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
а ӑ б в г д е ӗ ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с ҫ т у ӳ ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я

%{А%}:а %{А%}:е %{А%}:0
%{Ӑ%}:ӑ %{Ӑ%}:ӗ %{Ӑ%}:0
%{Ӳ%}:у %{Ӳ%}:ӳ %{Ӳ%}:0
%{и%}:и %{и%}:ӗ
%{н%}:н %{н%}:0
%{м%}:м %{м%}:0
%{Р%}:р %{Р%}:т
%>:0            ! Morpheme boundary
%{☭%}:0         ! Trigger for loan word phonology
%{´%}:0         ! Accent on the previous vowel
;

Sets

Vow   = А Ӑ Е Ӗ Ё И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я %{А%} %{Ӑ%} %{Ӳ%}
        а ӑ е ӗ ё и о у ӳ ы э ю я ;

Yot = Е е Ё ё Ю ю Я я ;

Cns   = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
        б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ ;

Back = А Ӑ Ы О У Я Ё Ю
       ӑ а ы о у я ё ю %{ъ%} ;

Rules

"и/ӗ in px3sp"
%{и%}:ӗ <=> :Cns %>: _ .#. ;

"Ablative р/т"
%{Р%}:т <=> [ л | р | н ] ( ь: ) %>: _ ;

"ь deletion"
ь:0 <=> _ %>: ;

"м with genitive"
%{м%}:0 <=> _ %>: ( :0 ) [ н | %{н%}:н ] ;

"н in suffixes"
%{н%}:0 <=> Cns %>: _ ;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphonemes {A}, {Ӑ} and {Ӳ}"
Arch:B <=> Back: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;
      except _ %>: :Vow ;
          _ %{´%}:0 %>: :Vow [ .#. | %>: | %{☭%}: ] ;
          %{м%}: %>: _ н ;
      where
          Arch in ( %{А%} %{Ӑ%} %{Ӳ%} )
          B    in ( а ӑ у ) matched ;

"Vowel drop at morpheme boundary"
! ш о с с е:0 >:0 ӳ
V:0 <=> _ %>: :Vow ;
      _ %{´%}:0 %>: :Vow [ .#. | %>: | %{☭%}: ] ;
      %{м%}: %>: _ н ;
      where V in Vow ;

"Vowel drop at accentuated morpheme boundary"
! ш о с с е >:0 ӗ:0 н
V:0 <=> :Vow %{´%}:0 %>: _ [ : - .#. - %>: - %{☭%}: - %{´%}: ] ;
      where V in Vow ;
